Maryland, session 2025, HB0999.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
24–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0999*

HOUSE BILL 999
(f) “Program” means an Opioid–Associated Disease Prevention and Outreach
Program.
24–902.
(a) (1) A Program may be established by a local health department or a
community–based organization, subject to the provisions of this subtitle.
(2) (i) A county may cooperate with another county to establish a
Program.
(ii) A community–based organization may establish a multicounty
Program.
(3) This subtitle does not apply to the AIDS Prevention Sterile Needle and
Syringe Exchange Pilot Program established under Subtitle 8 of this title.
(c) If established under subsection (a) of this section, a Program shall:
(1) Provide for substance use outreach, education, and linkage to treatment
services to participants, including distribution and collection of hypodermic needles and
syringes; and
(2) Operate in accordance with:
(i) The technical assistance of the Standing Advisory Committee;
and
(ii) The procedures, plans, and protocols approved by:
1. The local health officer for each county in which a Program
is established; and
2. The Department.
24–907.
(A) A Program shall collect and report at least annually the following data to the
Department:
(1) The number of participants served by the Program;
(2) The number of new participants registered by the Program during the
reporting period;
(3) Demographic profiles of participants served by the Program, including:

HOUSE BILL 999 3
(i) Age;
(ii) Gender;
(iii) Race;
(iv) Zip code; and
(v) Types of drugs used;
(4) The number of hypodermic needles and syringes distributed and
collected;
(5) Each location at which hypodermic needles and syringes were
distributed; and
(6) The number of linkages provided to participants under § 24–903(a)(6)
of this subtitle.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT THE DATA REPORTED FROM A
PROGRAM TO THE LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT FOR EACH COUNTY IN WHICH THE
PROGRAM OPERATES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.